Arkansas, session 2025, SB503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-908, concerning an employer's
withholding return and payment of withheld taxes, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(i)(1) An employer that is required to file the annual statement of
withholding under § 26-51-909(b) electronically shall file the withholding
return required under this section electronically.
(2) A company or other business enterprise that provides the
service of reporting and remitting withholding tax on the wages paid to
Arkansas employees by another employer for a withholding tax reporting period
shall file the withholding return required under this section with the
*JLL317*
03/18/2025 1:18:20 PM JLL317

SB503
secretary electronically if the other employer is required to file the annual
statement of withholding under § 26-51-909(b) electronically.
(3) The secretary may waive the requirements of this subsection
if the secretary determines, on the basis of an application by an employer,
that filing the withholding return electronically would cause an undue
hardship on the employer.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-909(b)(2)(B), concerning the annual
income tax withholding statement, is amended to read as follows:
(B) An employer who has one hundred twenty-five (125)
seventy-five (75) or more employees during the employer's income year shall
file the statement electronically.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATES.
(a) Section 1 of this act is effective for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2026.
(b) Section 2 of this act is effective for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2025.


















03/18/2025 1:18:20 PM JLL317